src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/A-a1-adj_hias_ias_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 
# Adjectives: puhas, hias, 


  Adj - puhas: #  GOLD EJ KLAR
     puhas+A+Sg+Nom: puhas
     puhas+A+Sg+Gen: puhthaan
     puhas+A+Sg+Par: puhasta
     puhas+A+Sg+Nom: puhas  
     puhas+A+Sg+Gen: puhthaan 
     puhas+A+Sg+Par: puhasta
     puhas+A+Sg+Ill: puhthaasheen
     puhas+A+Sg+Ine: puhthaassa
     puhas+A+Sg+Ela: puhthaasta
     puhas+A+Sg+All: puhthaale
     puhas+A+Sg+Ade: puhthaala
     puhas+A+Sg+Abl: puhthaalta
     puhas+A+Sg+Ess: puhthaana
     puhas+A+Sg+Tra: puhthaaksi
     puhas+A+Pl+Nom: puhthaat
     puhas+A+Pl+Gen: puhthaitten
     puhas+A+Pl+Par: puhthaita
     puhas+A+Pl+Ill: [puhthaishiin, puhthain]
     puhas+A+Pl+Ine: puhthaissa
     puhas+A+Pl+Ela: puhthaista
     puhas+A+Pl+All: puhthaile
     puhas+A+Pl+Ade: puhthaila
     puhas+A+Pl+Abl: puhthailta
     puhas+A+Pl+Ess: puhthaina
     puhas+A+Pl+Tra: puhthaiksi
     puhas+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: puhthaampi
     puhas+A+Comp+Sg+Gen: puhthaiman
     puhas+A+Comp+Sg+Par: puhthaimpaa
     puhas+A+Comp+Sg+Ill: puhthaimphaan
     puhas+A+Comp+Sg+Ine: puhthaimassa
     puhas+A+Comp+Sg+Ela: puhthaimasta
     puhas+A+Comp+Sg+All: puhthaimalle
     puhas+A+Comp+Sg+Ade: puhthaimalla
     puhas+A+Comp+Sg+Abl: puhthaimalta
     puhas+A+Comp+Sg+Ess: puhthaimpanna
     puhas+A+Comp+Sg+Tra: puhthaimaksi
     puhas+A+Comp+Pl+Nom: puhthaimat
     puhas+A+Comp+Pl+Gen: puhthaimitten
     puhas+A+Comp+Pl+Par: puhthaimpia
     puhas+A+Comp+Pl+Ill: puhthaimphiin
     puhas+A+Comp+Pl+Ine: puhthaimissa
     puhas+A+Comp+Pl+Ela: puhthaimista
     puhas+A+Comp+Pl+All: puhthaimille
     puhas+A+Comp+Pl+Ade: puhthaimilla
     puhas+A+Comp+Pl+Abl: puhthaimilta
     puhas+A+Comp+Pl+Ess: puhthaimpinna
     puhas+A+Comp+Pl+Tra: puhthaimiksi
     puhas+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: puhthain
     puhas+A+Superl+Sg+Gen: puhthaiman
     puhas+A+Superl+Sg+Par: puhthaimpaa
     puhas+A+Superl+Sg+Ill: puhthaimphaan
     puhas+A+Superl+Sg+Ine: puhthaimassa
     puhas+A+Superl+Sg+Ela: puhthaimasta
     puhas+A+Superl+Sg+All: puhthaimalle
     puhas+A+Superl+Sg+Ade: puhthaimalla
     puhas+A+Superl+Sg+Abl: puhthaimalta
     puhas+A+Superl+Sg+Ess: puhthaimpanna
     puhas+A+Superl+Sg+Tra: puhthaimaksi
     puhas+A+Superl+Pl+Nom: puhthaimat
     puhas+A+Superl+Pl+Gen: [puhthaimitten, puhthaimpien]
     puhas+A+Superl+Pl+Par: puhthaimpia
     puhas+A+Superl+Pl+Ill: puhthaimphiin
     puhas+A+Superl+Pl+Ine: puhthaimissa
     puhas+A+Superl+Pl+Ela: puhthaimista
     puhas+A+Superl+Pl+All: puhthaimille
     puhas+A+Superl+Pl+Ade: puhthaimilla
     puhas+A+Superl+Pl+Abl: puhthaimilta
     puhas+A+Superl+Pl+Ess: puhthaimpinna
     puhas+A+Superl+Pl+Tra: puhthaimiksi

     

Adj hias: #  GOLD
     hias+A+Sg+Nom: hias
     hias+A+Sg+Gen: hithaan
     hias+A+Sg+Par: hiasta
     hias+A+Sg+Ill: hithaasheen
     hias+A+Sg+Ine: hithaassa
     hias+A+Sg+Ela: hithaasta
     hias+A+Sg+All: hithaale
     hias+A+Sg+Ade: hithaala
     hias+A+Sg+Abl: hithaalta
     hias+A+Sg+Ess: hithaana
     hias+A+Sg+Tra: hithaaksi
     hias+A+Pl+Nom: hithaat
     hias+A+Pl+Gen: [hithaamitten, hithaampien]
     hias+A+Pl+Par: hithaita
     hias+A+Pl+Ill: hithaishiin
     hias+A+Pl+Ine: hithaissa
     hias+A+Pl+Ela: hithaista
     hias+A+Pl+All: hithaile
     hias+A+Pl+Ade: hithaila
     hias+A+Pl+Abl: hithailta
     hias+A+Pl+Ess: hithaina
     hias+A+Pl+Tra: hithaiksi
     hias+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: hithaampi
     hias+A+Comp+Sg+Gen: hithaaman
     hias+A+Comp+Sg+Par: hithaampaa
     hias+A+Comp+Sg+Ill: hithaamphaan
     hias+A+Comp+Sg+Ine: hithaamassa
     hias+A+Comp+Sg+Ela: hithaamasta
     hias+A+Comp+Sg+All: hithaamalle
     hias+A+Comp+Sg+Ade: hithaamalla
     hias+A+Comp+Sg+Abl: hithaamalta
     hias+A+Comp+Sg+Ess: hithaampanna
     hias+A+Comp+Sg+Tra: hithaamaksi
     hias+A+Comp+Pl+Nom: hithaamat
     hias+A+Comp+Pl+Gen: hithaamitten
     hias+A+Comp+Pl+Par: hithaampia
     hias+A+Comp+Pl+Ill: hithaamphiin
     hias+A+Comp+Pl+Ine: hithaamissa
     hias+A+Comp+Pl+Ela: hithaamista
     hias+A+Comp+Pl+All: hithaamille
     hias+A+Comp+Pl+Ade: hithaamilla
     hias+A+Comp+Pl+Abl: hithaamilta
     hias+A+Comp+Pl+Ess: hithaampinna
     hias+A+Comp+Pl+Tra: hithaamiksi
     hias+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: hithain
     hias+A+Superl+Sg+Gen: hithaiman
     hias+A+Superl+Sg+Par: hithaimpaa
     hias+A+Superl+Sg+Ill: hithaimphaan
     hias+A+Superl+Sg+Ine: hithaimassa
     hias+A+Superl+Sg+Ela: hithaimasta
     hias+A+Superl+Sg+All: hithaimalle
     hias+A+Superl+Sg+Ade: hithaimalla
     hias+A+Superl+Sg+Abl: hithaimalta
     hias+A+Superl+Sg+Ess: hithaimpanna
     hias+A+Superl+Sg+Tra: hithaimaksi
     hias+A+Superl+Pl+Nom: hithaimat
     hias+A+Superl+Pl+Gen: [hithaimitten, hithaimpien]
     hias+A+Superl+Pl+Par: hithaimpia
     hias+A+Superl+Pl+Ill: hithaimphiin
     hias+A+Superl+Pl+Ine: hithaimissa
     hias+A+Superl+Pl+Ela: hithaimista
     hias+A+Superl+Pl+All: hithaimille
     hias+A+Superl+Pl+Ade: hithaimilla
     hias+A+Superl+Pl+Abl: hithaimilta
     hias+A+Superl+Pl+Ess: hithaimpinna
     hias+A+Superl+Pl+Tra: hithaimiksi
